North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 1. General.

§ 108A-145.1.
Short title and purpose.

This Article shall be known as the “Hospital Assessment Act.” This Article does not authorize a political subdivision of the State to license a hospital for revenue or impose a tax or assessment on a hospital.

History.

2021-61, s. 2.

§ 108A-145.3.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Article:

Acute care hospital. — A hospital licensed in North Carolina that is not a freestanding psychiatric hospital, a freestanding rehabilitation hospital, a long-term care hospital, or a State-owned and State-operated hospital.

Base capitation rate. — A periodic per-enrollee or per-event amount paid by the Department to prepaid health plans for the delivery of Medicaid and NC Health Choice services in accordance with Article 4 of Chapter 108D of the General Statutes applicable to a particular rating group and appearing in a Medicaid managed care capitation rate certification, as adjusted by the Department and allowed by CMS in accordance with Part 438 of Subchapter C of Chapter IV of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

Capitated contract plan type. — Any type of capitated prepaid health plan contract defined in

G.S. 108D-1

.

CMS. — Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

Critical access hospital. — As defined in 42 C.F.R. § 400.202.

Federal medical assistance percentage (FMAP). — The federal share of North Carolina Medicaid service costs as calculated by the federal Department of Health and Human Services in accordance with section 1905(b) of the Social Security Act, in effect at the start of the applicable assessment quarter, expressed as a decimal.

Hospital costs. — A hospital’s costs as calculated using the most recent available Hospital Cost Report Information System’s cost report data available through CMS, including both inpatient and outpatient components.

Inpatient hospital financing percentage. — For the 2021-2022 State fiscal year, the inpatient hospital financing percentage is sixty-five and seventy-four hundredths percent (65.74%), expressed as a decimal. For each subsequent State fiscal year, the inpatient hospital financing percentage is the sum of the inpatient hospital financing percentage for the previous State fiscal year plus the market basket percentage, divided by the sum of one plus the market basket percentage.

Inpatient hospital services. — As defined in the Medicaid State Plan, excluding payments made under the graduate medical education methodology and the disproportionate share hospital methodology.

Inpatient portion of the statewide capitation rate. — The amount of the statewide capitation rate applicable to a particular rating group that is attributed to inpatient hospital facility health services in the applicable Medicaid managed care rate certification, expressed as a statewide weighted average of all PHP regions.

Market basket percentage. — The hospital inpatient prospective payment system market basket minus the multifactor productivity adjustment established in rule by CMS and in effect on March 1 of the previous State fiscal year, expressed as a decimal.

Medicaid managed care capitation rate certification. — A rate certification for any capitated contract plan type that contains the rates paid to prepaid health plans and that has been submitted to CMS under 42 C.F.R. § 438.7 and, except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, (i) has been approved by CMS and (ii) is in effect during the applicable time period. If, on the first day of any assessment quarter, CMS has not approved a rate certification for a particular capitated contract plan type for that quarter, then the Medicaid managed care capitation rate certification for that capitated contract plan type is the rate certification submitted to CMS under 42 C.F.R. § 438.7 applicable to that quarter.

(12a)

Medicare Economic Index. — The index published by the Medicare Economic Index Technical Advisory Panel established by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, under the authority in 42 U.S.C. § 217a, and in effect on March 1 of the previous State fiscal year.

Outpatient hospital financing percentage. — Twenty-seven and sixty-nine hundredths percent (27.69%), expressed as a decimal.

Outpatient hospital services. — As defined in the Medicaid State Plan.

Outpatient portion of the statewide capitation rate. — The amount of the statewide capitation rate applicable to a particular rating group that is attributed to outpatient hospital facility services and emergency room facility services in the applicable Medicaid managed care capitation rate certifications, expressed as a statewide weighted average of all PHP regions.

Paid capitation. — The total amount of the capitation payments made by the Department to all prepaid health plans for a particular rating group (i) attributable to the base capitation rate in the applicable Medicaid managed care capitation rate certification and (ii) adjusted by the Department as a result of retroactively implementing any base capitation rate adjustment that is approved by CMS or allowed under Part 438 of Subchapter C of Chapter IV of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

Previous data collection period. — The period beginning on the eleventh day of the month that is four months prior to the start of the applicable assessment quarter and ending on the tenth day of the month prior to the start of the applicable assessment quarter.

Private acute care hospital. — An acute care hospital that (i) is not qualified to certify public expenditures as described in 42 C.F.R. § 433.51(b), (ii) is not a critical access hospital, and (iii) is not part of the UNC Health Care System.

Private hospital historical assessment share. — Eighty and twenty-five hundredths percent (80.25%), expressed as a decimal.

Public acute care hospital. — An acute care hospital that (i) is qualified to certify public expenditures as described in 42 C.F.R. § 433.51(b), (ii) is not a critical access hospital, (iii) is not part of the UNC Health Care System, and (iv) is not the primary affiliated teaching hospital for the East Carolina University Brody School of Medicine.

Public hospital historical assessment share. — Nineteen and seventy-five hundredths percent (19.75%), expressed as a decimal.

Rating group. — A category of beneficiaries or maternity services for which a periodic per-enrollee or per-event amount appears in a Medicaid managed care capitation rate certification.

State’s annual Medicaid payment. — An annual amount equal to one hundred ten million dollars ($110,000,000) for the period July 1, 2021, through June 30, 2022, increased each year over the prior year’s payment by the market basket percentage.

Statewide capitation rate. — A periodic per-enrollee or per-event amount paid by the Department to prepaid health plans for the delivery of Medicaid and NC Health Choice services in accordance with Article 4 of Chapter 108D of the General Statutes applicable to a particular rating group, expressed as a statewide weighted average for the applicable capitated contract plan type for all PHP regions and appearing in a Medicaid managed care capitation rate certification, as adjusted by the Department and allowed by CMS in accordance with Part 438 of Subchapter C of Chapter IV of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

Third-party coverage. — Liability by any individual, entity, or program for the payment of all or part of the expenditures for medical assistance under the Medicaid State Plan that has been identified by the Department before making the medical assistance expenditure.

University of North Carolina Health Care System (UNC Health Care System). — As established in

G.S. 116-37

and including the following hospitals:

The University of North Carolina Hospitals at Chapel Hill.

Rex Hospital, Inc.

Chatham Hospital, Incorporated.

UNC Rockingham Health Care, Inc.

Caldwell Memorial Hospital, Incorporated.

History.

2021-61, s. 2; 2021-180, ss. 9D.13A(a), 9D.13A(g), 9D.13A.(h).

§ 108A-145.5.
Due dates and collections.

Assessments under this Article are calculated, imposed, and due quarterly in the time and manner prescribed by the Secretary and shall be considered delinquent if not paid within seven calendar days of this due date.

With respect to any hospital owing a past-due assessment amount under this Article, the Department may withhold the unpaid amount from Medicaid or NC Health Choice payments otherwise due or impose a late payment penalty. The Secretary may waive a penalty for good cause shown.

In the event the data necessary to calculate an assessment under this Article is not available to the Secretary in time to impose the quarterly assessment, the Secretary may defer the due date for the assessment to a subsequent quarter.

History.

2021-61, s. 2.

§ 108A-145.7.
Assessment appeals.

A hospital may appeal a determination of the assessment amount owed through a reconsideration review. The pendency of an appeal does not relieve a hospital from its obligation to pay an assessment amount when due.

History.

2021-61, s. 2.

§ 108A-145.9.
Allowable costs; patient billing.

Assessments paid under this Article may be included as allowable costs of a hospital for purposes of any applicable Medicaid reimbursement formula, except that assessments paid under this Article shall be excluded from cost settlement.

Assessments imposed under this Article may not be added as a surtax or assessment on a patient’s bill.

History.

2021-61, s. 2.

§ 108A-145.11.
Rulemaking authority.

The Secretary may adopt rules to implement this Article.

History.

2021-61, s. 2.

§ 108A-145.13.
Repeal.

If CMS determines that an assessment under this Article is impermissible or revokes approval of an assessment under this Article, then that assessment shall not be imposed and the Department’s authority to collect the assessment is repealed.

History.

2021-61, s. 2.